New York, session 2025-2026, S7856.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 1 of subsection (a) of section 2336 of the insur- 2 ance law, as amended by section 3 of chapter 4 of the laws of 2021, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (1) Any schedule of rates or rating plan for motor vehicle liability 5 and collision insurance submitted to the superintendent shall provide 6 for an actuarially appropriate reduction in premium charges for any 7 insured for a three year period after successfully completing a motor 8 vehicle accident prevention course, known as the national safety coun- 9 cil's defensive driving course, or any driver improvement course 10 approved by the department of motor vehicles as being equivalent to the 11 national safety council's defensive driving course, provided that, 12 except as provided in article twelve-C of the vehicle and traffic law, 13 there shall be no reduction in premiums for a self-instruction defensive 14 driving course or a course that does not provide for actual classroom 15 instruction for a minimum number of hours as determined by the depart- 16 ment of motor vehicles. Such reduction in premium charges shall be 17 subsequently modified to the extent appropriate, based upon analysis of 18 loss experience statistics and other relevant factors. All such accident 19 prevention courses shall be monitored by the department of motor vehi- 20 cles and shall include components of instruction in "Portable Electronic 21 Device" awareness, "Cannabis Use" awareness, "Road Rage" awareness and 22 [in] "Work Zone Safety" awareness as defined by the commissioner of 23 motor vehicles. The provisions of this section shall not apply to 24 attendance at a program pursuant to article twenty-one of the vehicle 25 and traffic law as a result of any traffic infraction. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11986-01-5 S. 7856 2 1 § 2. Paragraph 1 of subsection (a) of section 2336 of the insurance 2 law, as amended by section 4 of chapter 4 of the laws of 2021, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (1) Any schedule of rates or rating plan for motor vehicle liability 5 and collision insurance submitted to the superintendent shall provide 6 for an actuarially appropriate reduction in premium charges for any 7 insured for a three year period after successfully completing a motor 8 vehicle accident prevention course, known as the national safety coun- 9 cil's defensive driving course, or any driver improvement course 10 approved by the department of motor vehicles as being equivalent to the 11 national safety council's defensive driving course, provided that in 12 either event there shall be no reduction in premiums for a self-instruc- 13 tion defensive driving course or a course that does not provide for 14 actual classroom instruction for a minimum number of hours as determined 15 by the department of motor vehicles. Such reduction in premium charges 16 shall be subsequently modified to the extent appropriate, based upon 17 analysis of loss experience statistics and other relevant factors. All 18 such accident prevention courses shall be monitored by the department of 19 motor vehicles and shall include components of instruction in "Portable 20 Electronic Device" awareness, "Cannabis Use" awareness, "Road Rage" 21 awareness and [in] "Work Zone Safety" awareness as defined by the 22 commissioner of motor vehicles. The provisions of this section shall not 23 apply to attendance at a program pursuant to article twenty-one of the 24 vehicle and traffic law as a result of any traffic infraction. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 26 the amendments to paragraph 1 of subsection (a) of section 2336 of the 27 insurance law made by section one of this act shall be subject to the 28 expiration and reversion of such subsection pursuant to section 5 of 29 chapter 751 of the laws of 2005, as amended, when upon such date the 30 provisions of section two of this act shall take effect.